Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 20

Processing, Grading, Labeling, and Marketing of Products

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-7 may not apply to subchapter 8 which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Publisher's Notes. With respect to certain fruits and vegetables intended for shipment outside the state, this subchapter may be superseded by §2-20-301 et seq. governing labeling of fruits and vegetables for interstate shipment.

Cross References. Landlords or laborers lien superior to purchase of ginner's receipt, §18-41-107.

Effective Dates. Acts 1925, No. 218, § 20: July 1, 1925.

2-20-101. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Agricultural Products Grading Act of 1925”.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 12384; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-501.

2-20-102. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural products” means horticultural, viticultural, bee, and other agricultural products;

“Board” means the State Plant Board;

“Director” means the Director of the State Plant Board;

“Persons” means individuals, partnerships, corporations, associations, or two (2) or more individuals having a joint or common interest; and

“Places” means vessels, cars, and other vehicles, buildings, docks, railroad platforms, orchards, fields, and other premises where agricultural products are kept, handled, or grown.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 12385; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-502.

2-20-103. Penalty.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 16; Pope's Dig., § 12398; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-515; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 233.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “Class B” and deleted “and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred ($500) or by imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or by both fine and imprisonment” from the end.

2-20-104. Official standards for grading.

In order to promote, protect, further, and develop the agricultural interests of this state, the State Plant Board, after investigation and public hearing, is authorized and empowered to fix and promulgate official standards for grading and classifying any or all agricultural products grown or produced in this state and to fix and promulgate official standards for containers of farm products and to change any of them from time to time.

The board, in its rules or notices promulgated under this subchapter, shall prescribe such tolerances as may be deemed necessary, permitting variations from the standards fixed under the provisions of this subchapter as are reasonably incident to the proper grading of agricultural products or to the manufacture of containers for farm products.

Cited: Stuttgart Rice Mill Co. v. Crandall, 203 Ark. 281, 157 S.W.2d 205 (1941).

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 12386; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-503.

2-20-105. Notice of standards.

In promulgating the standards or any alterations or modifications of the standards, the State Plant Board shall specify the date when they shall become effective and shall give public notice, not less than thirty (30) days in advance of the date when the standard for any agricultural product shall become effective and one (1) year in advance of the date when the standard for any container shall become effective, by such means as the board deems proper.

The Director of the State Plant Board is authorized and empowered to employ reasonable methods for diffusing information concerning the standard that may be fixed by the board for any agricultural product or container.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 12387; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-504.

2-20-106. Adoption of federal standards.

The State Plant Board is authorized to fix and promulgate as the official standard of this state for any agricultural product or container the standard for the product or container which may have been promulgated or announced therefor under the authority of the United States Congress.

In carrying out the provisions of this subchapter, the Director of the State Plant Board is authorized to cooperate with the United States or any department thereof in accomplishing the matters and things provided for in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 12388; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-505.

2-20-107. Container standards.

When any standard for a container for an agricultural product becomes effective under this subchapter, then no person shall manufacture for commerce within the jurisdiction of this state or sell, ship, or offer for sale in commerce any container, either filled or unfilled, to which that standard is applicable when the container does not comply with the standard, subject to such tolerance as may be permitted under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 14; Pope's Dig., § 12396; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-513.

2-20-108. Unlawful sale or disposal.

It shall be unlawful for any person to offer for sale or to sell or otherwise dispose of any agricultural product in this state under any grade name or classification fixed for that agricultural product under the provisions of this subchapter or under any description, name, or designation which would reasonably be construed to refer to any grade name or classification fixed for that agricultural product under the provisions of this subchapter unless that agricultural product is graded or classified in conformity with the standard which may be specified for that grade or classification of the agricultural product under the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 15; Pope's Dig., § 12397; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-514.

2-20-109. Suspension or revocation of licenses.

The Director of the State Plant Board may designate any competent inspector or other employee or agent of the State Plant Board and, upon satisfactory evidence of competency, may license any other person, and charge and collect a reasonable fee for the license, to inspect or classify agricultural products in accordance with such rules as the board may prescribe at such places as the volume of business may be found to warrant the furnishing of inspection service, at the request of persons having an interest in products and to ascertain and certify the grade, classification, quality, or condition thereof, and such other pertinent facts as the board may require.

The board is authorized to fix, assess, and collect or cause to be collected fees for services when they are performed by inspectors, employees, or agents of the board.

Licensed inspectors may charge and collect as compensation for services only such fees as may be approved by the board.

The director may suspend or revoke any license whenever, after an opportunity for hearing has been afforded to the licensee, the director shall determine that the licensee is incompetent, or has knowingly or carelessly failed to grade or classify any agricultural product in accordance with such standards, or has knowingly or carelessly failed to correctly certify the grade, classification, quality, or condition of any agricultural product, or has violated any provision of this subchapter, or of the rules made pursuant thereto.

Pending investigations, the director may suspend a licensee temporarily without a hearing.

Cross References. Licenses and permits, removal of disqualification for criminal offenses, §17-1-103.

Accept money or other consideration, directly or indirectly, for any incorrect or improper performance of duty.

Cross References. Deposit of fees into state treasury, §2-16-104.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 12389; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-506.

2-20-110. Inspectors, employees, and agents.

The Director of the State Plant Board may appoint deputy inspectors, employees, and agents to assist in carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

(1)The director may require any employee or agent and any inspector licensed under this subchapter to be covered by a good and sufficient bond, payable to the state, conditional upon the faithful performance of each employee, agent, or licensed inspector of his or her duties as an employee, agent, or licensed inspector.

Any person injured by the failure of an employee, agent, or licensed inspector faithfully to perform such duties shall be entitled to sue on the bond in his or her own name in any court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of such damages as he or she may have sustained by reason of that failure.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 12393; Acts 1985, No. 279, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-510.

2-20-111. Unlawful actions — Improper influence.

It shall be unlawful for any inspector, employee, or agent employed under the provisions of this subchapter, or any inspector licensed under it, to:

Knowingly inspect, grade, or classify improperly any agricultural product;

Knowingly give any incorrect certificate of grade, classification, quality, or condition; or

It shall be unlawful for any person to improperly influence or attempt to improperly influence any inspector, employee, agent, or licensed inspector in the performance of his or her duties.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 11; Pope's Dig., § 12394; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-511.

2-20-112. Administration.

The State Plant Board is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and notices for carrying out the purposes and provisions of this subchapter.

All fees and moneys collected or received by inspectors, employees, or agents of the board under this subchapter and the rules which may be promulgated under it shall be deposited in a manner prescribed in §2-16-210 and shall be used for carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 12392; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-509.

2-20-113. Right of inspection.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions and requirements of this subchapter and the rules and notices made and promulgated under it, the State Plant Board and its inspectors shall have power to enter into or upon any place and to open any bundle, package, or container of agricultural products.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 18; Pope's Dig., § 12400; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-517.

2-20-114. Appeal of certification.

Whenever any quantity of any agricultural product shall have been inspected under this subchapter and a question arises as to whether the certificate issued therefor shows the true grade, classification, quality, or condition of the product, any interested person, subject to the rules as the State Plant Board may prescribe, may appeal the question to the Director of the State Plant Board.

The director is authorized to cause an investigation to be made and such tests to be applied as he or she may deem necessary and to determine and issue a finding of the true grade or classification of the product or of the quality or condition thereof.

Whenever an appeal shall be taken to the director under this section, he or she shall charge and assess and collect or cause to be collected a reasonable fee, to be fixed by him or her, which shall be refunded if the appeal is sustained.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 12390; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-507.

2-20-115. Certificate as evidence.

When not superseded by a finding on appeal of the grade, classification, quality, or condition of any agricultural product, a certificate issued under this subchapter and all certificates issued under authority of the United States Congress relating to grade, classification, quality, or condition of agricultural products shall be accepted in any court of this state as prima facie evidence of true grade, classification, condition, or quality of the agricultural product at the time of its inspection.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 12391; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-508.

2-20-116. Misrepresentations.

If any quantity of any agricultural product shall have been inspected and a certificate issued under this subchapter showing the grade, classification, quality, or condition thereof, no person shall represent the grade, classification, quality, or condition of the product at the time and place of the inspection as other than shown by the certificate.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 12; Pope's Dig., § 12395; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-512.

2-20-117. Rule of agency.

In construing and enforcing the provisions of this subchapter, the act, omission, or failure of any official, agent, or other person acting for or employed by any person, association, partnership, or corporation within the scope of his or her employment or office shall also be deemed in every case the act, omission, or failure of such person, association, partnership, or corporation as well as that of the official, agent, or person.

History.

Acts 1925, No. 218, § 17; Pope's Dig., § 12399; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-516.

Subchapter 2

— Cotton and Cotton Gins

Cross References. Inspection of boilers, §20-23-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1901, No. 77, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1919, No. 447, § 5: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 27, 1919.

Acts 1937, No. 318, § 3: approved Mar. 25, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “The theft of seed cotton and the selling thereof to ginners by the person stealing same being a serious menace to the cotton growing farmers of this state, it is necessary, in order to preserve the peace and safety of the state that the provisions of this act shall go into effect at once; and an emergency is therefore declared to exist and the provisions of this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

2-20-201. Public cotton gin defined.

All cotton gins in Arkansas which gin cotton other than that grown on the farm where the gin is located or on a farm owned or controlled by the operator of the gin are declared to be public cotton gins.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 447, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 10454; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-801.

2-20-202. Order in ginning.

All public cotton gins in this state as defined in § 2-20-201 are required to gin all cotton brought to the gin for ginning in the order in which it is presented for ginning.

Cotton offered for ginning from vehicles shall be ginned as provided and ahead of cotton stored in gin buildings if, at the time offered, it is in condition to be ginned.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (a)(1).

Name and address of the seller;

Amount of seed cotton purchased;

Date purchased; and

Purchase price.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 447, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 10455; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-802.

2-20-203. Method of ginning.

All cotton ginned by public gins in this state, as defined in §2-20-201, shall be ginned in such a manner as to make a good sample and to give a reasonable turnout according to the condition of the cotton and shall be paid for by the person having the cotton ginned at a reasonable price per one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) of seed cotton, plus the bagging and ties furnished by the ginner at a reasonable price.

The seed from any cotton ginned shall be delivered to the person having it ginned at his or her request or may be purchased by the ginner at such price as may be agreed upon.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 447, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 10456; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-803.

2-20-204. Remedies for refusing to gin.

(1)Any person, firm, or corporation operating any public gin in this state as defined in §2-20-201 who shall fail or refuse to gin cotton as required by §§2-20-202 and2-20-203 shall be guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, an offender shall be fined in any sum not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than fifty dollars ($50.00).

Each violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

In addition to the fine, the offender shall be liable for double damages to the person aggrieved in a civil action.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 447, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 10457; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-804; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 13.

2-20-205. Records of seed cotton.

Every person or corporation owning or operating any cotton gin within this state shall make and keep in a well-bound book a record of all seed cotton purchased at or for the gin, which shall show the:

The record shall be open at all times for inspection by any justice of the peace, constable, deputy constable, sheriff, deputy sheriff, prosecuting attorney, or deputy prosecuting attorney.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 318, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 3064; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-805.

2-20-206. Failure to keep gin record.

Any person or corporation owning or operating any gin within the State of Arkansas who shall fail to make and keep the record required in §2-20-205 or who shall refuse or fail to permit its inspection by any of the officers mentioned in §2-20-205 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, an offender shall be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History.

Acts 1937, No. 318, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 3065; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-806.

2-20-207. Record of cotton weighed.

All persons weighing cotton for the public in this state and receiving compensation therefor shall be required to keep a book or record of all cotton weighed by them, giving:

The weight and marks of each bale;

For whom weighed; and

To whom sold where the purchaser is known to the weigher.

The book or record shall be kept subject to inspection by the public.

History.

Acts 1901, No. 77, § 1, p. 130; C. & M. Dig., § 2446; Pope's Dig., § 3068; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-811.

2-20-208. Failure to keep weighing record.

Any weigher who shall refuse to keep books or records or who shall, on demand of any person, fail or refuse to exhibit them shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Upon conviction, an offender shall be fined in any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Acts 1901, No. 77, § 2, p. 130; C. & M. Dig., § 2446; Pope's Dig., § 3068; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-812.

Subchapter 3

— Labeling of Fruits and Vegetables for Interstate Shipment

Preambles. Acts 1947, No. 343 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the neglect of proper labeling as to actual contents of packaged peaches, tomatoes, strawberries, Irish potatoes, and apples grown in Arkansas; and the attendant unfair and unethical practices of selling inferior products misrepresented as high grade perishables, has resulted in lower prices received by Arkansas producers than are received by growers in competing states, and a generally poor reputation for Arkansas grown products; and

“Whereas, reputable producers of these products in this state have suffered unfairly a consumer reaction against their products, the following act is proposed for their protection against such unfair marketing practices and in order that an improved and recognized quality of Arkansas packaged peaches, tomatoes, strawberries, Irish potatoes, and apples may be sold in competition with such products grown in other states … .”

2-20-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Fruit and Vegetable Labeling Act of 1947”, which is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the general welfare of the people of this state.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-601.

2-20-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Closed package” means a barrel, box, basket, sack, carrier, or crate, of which all of the contents cannot readily be seen or inspected when the package is prepared for market;

“Culls” means products which, on account of quality and condition, do not come within any of the above classifications or grades;

“Persons” means individuals, partnerships, corporations, associations, or associations of two (2) or more individuals having a joint or common interest;

“Places” means vessels, cars, and other vehicles, buildings, docks, railroad platforms, orchards, fields, and other premises where agricultural products are grown, kept, or handled;

“Ripes” means products which are too ripe or soft, due to ripeness only, to ship, but which are satisfactory for short hauls and immediate consumption;

“Ungraded” means products packaged which may be any combination of the United States standard grades or the grades established by this subchapter and, in addition, may include field run and all other grades with only soft and decayed fruit excluded; and

“Utility” or “combination” means products packaged which may be any combination of the United States standard grades or grades established by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-610.

2-20-303. Applicability.

The provisions of this subchapter are limited to peaches, tomatoes, strawberries, Irish potatoes, and apples which are grown and produced in Arkansas.

Standard grades for products covered by this subchapter shall be limited to United States grades and shall conform in all respects and be identical with the latest standards established by the United States Secretary of Agriculture.

The State Plant Board shall have authority to prescribe and promulgate an Arkansas Commercial or Utility Grade and other and additional grades of peaches.

Standard grades for peaches shall be the standard United States grades and the additional Arkansas grades designated as Utility or Combination, and Unclassified, and Ripes.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, §§ 2A, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-603, 77-604.

2-20-304. Transactions excepted.

This subchapter shall not apply to products:

Sold directly by a producer to consumer;

Sold by a producer in consumer packages or in bulk to retail trade exclusively in Arkansas; and

In transit from point of origin to a place of processing, further grading, or conditioning within Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-608.

2-20-305. Penalties.

Each person who by himself or herself or through his or her agent or employee violates any provision of this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor for each offense.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-609; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 403.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted the subsection (a) designation; inserted “or herself”, “or her”, and “Class C”; and deleted former (b).

2-20-306. Administration.

The State Plant Board shall administer and enforce the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-602.

2-20-307. Marking of closed containers.

It shall be unlawful for any person to expose or offer for sale or have in his or her possession for sale or sell, transport, deliver, or consign any product covered by this subchapter in a closed package unless the container has been plainly marked or tagged in an indelible manner showing:

The name and address of the producer, shipper, or other person responsible for packing the product;

Contents in terms of net weight, measure, or numerical count and variety, state of origin, minimum size, etc., depending on the product; and

The official grade of the product.

If the product does not conform to an official grade, the package or tag shall be marked “UNGRADED” or “CULLS”, as the case may be.

All markings shall be not less than one-fourth inch (¼") in height, except that “CULLS” must be marked in letters not less than one inch (1") in height.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-605.

2-20-308. False representations.

It shall be unlawful for any person to expose or offer for sale or sell, transport, deliver, or consign, or have in his or her possession for sale products covered by this subchapter packed in a closed package in which the label or exposed surface gives a false representation of the contents of the package.

It shall be considered a false representation if the exposed surface does not reasonably represent the size, quality, and varietal characteristics of the remaining portions of the package.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-606.

2-20-309. Used containers.

It shall be unlawful for any person to expose, or offer for sale or sell, transport, deliver, consign, or have in his or her possession for sale products covered by this subchapter which are packed in used containers unless the used containers are clean, sanitary, and otherwise adequate for use in the trade and all prior labelings or markings are erased or obliterated.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-607.

2-20-310. Right of inspection.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions and requirements of this subchapter, the State Plant Board and its inspectors shall have power to enter into or upon any place and to open any bundle, package, or container of agricultural products.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 343, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-611.

Subchapter 4

— Soybean Promotion

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 259, § 9: July 1, 1971.

Acts 1989, No. 102, § 4: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the soybean promotion in Arkansas that the assessment on soybeans for research, promotion and market development be increased from one cent per bushel to two cents per bushel to provide necessary funds to fund the program; that this act is designed to provide such increase and in order to assure effective and efficient administration of the increase levy, it is essential that the act become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year, July 1, 1989. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

2-20-401. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to promote the growth and development of the soybean industry in Arkansas by research, extension, promotion, and market development, thereby promoting the general welfare of the people of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 259, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2001; Acts 1991, No. 340, § 1.

2-20-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board created under this subchapter;

“Net market price” means:

The sales price or value received by a producer for soybeans after adjustments for any premium or discount based on grading or quality factors, as determined by the secretary; or

For soybeans pledged as collateral for a loan issued under any price support loan program administered by the Commodity Credit Corporation, the principal amount of the loan;

“Secretary” means the United States Secretary of Agriculture;

“Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act” means the federal Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act of 1990, Subtitle E of Title XIX, of the Food, Agriculture, Conservation and Trade Act of 1990, P.L. No. 101-624, as amended from time to time, and any order issued pursuant thereto by the secretary; and

“United Soybean Board” means the United Soybean Board created by the Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act.

Publisher's Notes. Former §2-20-402, concerning the applicability of the subchapter, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 340, § 2. The former section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 259, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-2005.

U.S. Code. The Soybean Promotion, Research and Consumer Information Act, referred to in this section, is codified as 7 U.S.C. § 6301 et seq.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 340, § 2.